Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and RCW 5.40.050 and 70.54.340 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Body art" means the practice of invasive cosmetic adornment including the use of branding and scarification. "Body art" also includes the intentional production of scars upon the body. "Body art" does not include any health-related procedures performed by licensed health care practitioners under their scope of practice.

(2) "Body piercing" means the process of penetrating the skin or mucous membrane to insert an object, including jewelry, for cosmetic purposes. "Body piercing" also includes any scar tissue resulting from or relating to the piercing. "Body piercing" does not include the use of stud and clasp piercing systems to pierce the earlobe in accordance with the manufacturer's directions and applicable United States food and drug administration requirements. "Body piercing" does not include any health-related procedures performed by licensed health care practitioners under their scope of practice, nor does anything in chapter 412, Laws of 2009 authorize a person registered to engage in the business of body piercing to implant or embed foreign objects into the human body or otherwise engage in the practice of medicine.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(4) "Individual license" means a body art, body piercing, or tattoo practitioner license issued under this chapter.

(5) "Location license" means a license issued under this chapter for a shop or business.

(6) "Shop or business" means a body art, body piercing, or tattooing shop or business.

(7) "Tattoo artist" means a person who pierces or punctures the human skin with a needle or other instrument for the purpose of implanting an indelible mark, or pigment, into the skin for a fee.

(8) "Tattooing" means to pierce or puncture the human skin with a needle or other instrument for the purpose of implanting an indelible mark, or pigment, into the skin.

[ 2009 c 412 s 2.]